Kentucky, session 2025RS, HB299.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER 67 IS CREATED TO
READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) For purposes of this section, "emergency shelter" means a facility for which the
primary purpose is to provide temporary shelter for persons experiencing
homelessness.
(2) The legislative body of each county shall establish and maintain, or contract with
an entity that establishes and maintains, at least one (1) emergency shelter that
operates within the county. The emergency shelter shall contain an adequate
number of beds, which shall be calculated by subtracting the total number of beds
dedicated to persons experiencing homelessness within the county from the total
number of persons experiencing homelessness within the county.
(3) The emergency shelter required by this section shall conform to all applicable
requirements of federal and state law.
(4) The Cabinet for Health and Family Services shall promulgate administrative
regulations in accordance with KRS Chapter 13A to provide standards regarding
the maintenance and operation of emergency shelters pursuant to this section.
(5) Nothing in this section shall be construed to prohibit any local government from
establishing additional regulations concerning the operation and maintenance of
emergency shelters or homeless shelters that are more stringent than any state or
federal laws or those established by administrative regulation.
Page 1 of 1
XXXX 2/4/2025 12:16 PM Jacketed